Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,203
Authority to transact business required.

(MBCA 15.01) (a) A foreign
corporation may not transact business in this state until it obtains a certificate
of authority from the Secretary of State.

(b) The following activities,
among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of
subsection (a) of this section:

(1) Maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding;

(2) Holding meetings of the
board of directors or shareholders or carrying on other activities concerning
internal corporate affairs;

(3)
Maintaining bank accounts;

(4)
Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration
of the corporation's own securities or maintaining trustees or depositaries
with respect to those securities;

(5) Selling through independent contractors;

(6) Soliciting or obtaining
orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the
orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

(7) Creating or acquiring
indebtedness, mortgages, and security interests in real or personal property;

(8) Securing or collecting
debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the
debts;

(9)
Owning, without more, real or personal property;

(10) Conducting an isolated transaction
that is completed within thirty days and that is not one in the course of
repeated transactions of a like nature;

(11) Transacting business in interstate commerce;
or

(12)
Acting as a foreign corporate trustee to the extent authorized under section
30-3820.

(c)
The list of activities in subsection (b) of this section is not exhaustive.

(d) The requirements of the
Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act are not applicable to foreign or alien
insurers which are subject to the requirements of Chapter 44.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 203.